District of Columbia statutes.
8-241.08

Common law unaffected.

The remedies under this chapter do not supplant rights and remedies that may be available against property owners and other liable parties under the common law.

History

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 309, 61 DCR 6767